South Dakota, session 2026, HB1195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 41-17:
Any South Dakota resident who is an enrolled member of an Indian tribe may
obtain free admission to any South Dakota state park or recreation area. The qualifying
individual may also receive a fifty percent discount on any camping fee or associated
electrical service fee established pursuant to § 41-17-1.1 or 41-17-14.1.
Any individual who applies for and qualifies for free admission under the provisions
of this section must be issued a lifetime park entrance license by the Department of Game,
Fish and Parks. The Game, Fish and Parks Commission shall promulgate rules pursuant to
chapter 1-26 establishing criteria and procedures for obtaining free admission and reduced
fees pursuant to this section and for the issuance of a lifetime park entrance license.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.